Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB752.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4915.2(c) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 4915.2. Failure to comply with 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 97 Subch. I registration requirements.* * *(a.2) Additional offense defined.--An individual who is subject to registration under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9799.55(b)(3) commits an offense if the individual knowingly violates 42 Pa.C.S. § 9799.55(e).* * *(c) Grading for sexually violent predators and others with 1234567891011121314151617181920 lifetime registration.--* * *(5) A n individual subject to registration under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9799.55(b)(3) who violates subsection (a.2) commits a felony of the second degree.* * *Section 2. Section 9799.55 of Title 42 is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 9799.55. Registration.* * *(e) Residency.--(1) A sexually violent predator may not reside within 2,500 feet of a public school, private school, parochial school or day-care center for the duration of the required period of registration under subsection (b).(2) A sexually violent predator who resides within 2,500 feet of a public school, private school, parochial school or day-care center on the effective date of this paragraph shall, within six months after the effective date of this paragraph or upon the expiration of the lease, rental agreement or similar contractual obligation regarding the residence, whichever is later, relocate to another residence that is situated at least 2,500 feet from a public school, private school, parochial school or day-care center.(3) If, on or after the effective date of this paragraph, a public school, private school, parochial school or day-care center opens at a location that is within 2,500 feet of the residence of a sexually violent predator, the sexually violent predator shall, within six months after the opening of the public school, private school, parochial 20250HB0752PN0776 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school or day-care center or upon the expiration of the lease, rental agreement or similar contractual obligation regarding the residence, whichever is later, relocate to another residence that is situated at least 2,500 feet from a public school, private school, parochial school or day-care center.(4) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to override or abrogate a law enforcement notification requirement under this chapter.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Day-care center." Premises operated for profit in which child care is provided simultaneously for five or more children who are not relatives of the operator of the premises."Public school." As defined in 24 Pa.C.S. § 8102 (relating to definitions).Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0752PN0776 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718